Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-530
Territory within village or city; inclusion within district; procedure.

The territory within the incorporated area of any village or city may be included within a rural or suburban fire protection district pursuant to sections 35-530 to 35-536.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 20.